Alabama, session 2026rs, SB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 11-3-61, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§11-3-61
(a) In addition to authority granted in Section
11-3-60, a county commission may adopt a procurement or
purchasing program designed to simplify the purchasing of
certain tangible personal property or services, provided the
program is designed in a manner that shall provide significant
cost savings or administrative savings to the county and
includes written policy and procedures for implementation and
administration of the program as set out in subsection (c).
For the purposes of this article, a "procurement or purchasing
program" is a purchase payment program utilized as an
alternative purchase order process with vendors agreeing to
participate in such process. The program shall be approved by
the county commission in order to allow individualized
purchases of tangible personal property items or services
which have received prior approval by the county commission
through use of a card programmed for limited purchases of
specific items or services by an individual designated by the
Page 2

specific items or services by an individual designated by the
SB117 INTRODUCED
county commission to make the purchases.
(b) Prior to implementation of a procurement or
purchasing program, the county commission shall make the
following determinations:
(1) That the program to be implemented meets
governmental accounting standards and practices for
development and administration of such program.
(2) That the program will provide significant cost
savings or administrative savings to the county.
(3) That the program has been developed and designed in
a manner that provides all necessary purchasing and accounting
documentation required by the Department of Examiners of
Public Accounts.
(4) That the program has been developed and designed
with sufficient safeguards to significantly reduce the risk of
mismanagement or misappropriation of funds.
(5) That the program will be carefully supervised and
overseen by the county chief administrative officer or his or
her designee.
(c) The county commission shall adopt written policy
and procedures for the implementation, administration, and
operation of the program, which policy and procedures shall
include at a minimum, each of the following:
(1) A monetary limit on the amount of any individual
purchase which may be made using a procurement or purchasing
card.
(2) A monetary limit on the total monthly amount that
may be purchased with a procurement or purchasing card, taking
Page 3

may be purchased with a procurement or purchasing card, taking
SB117 INTRODUCED
into consideration the county's debt limit.
(3) Procedures to ensure that any person utilizing a
procurement or purchasing card has been properly trained
regarding use of the card, including purchases whichthat are
allowed, proper process for documenting purchases, and daily
and monthly monetary limits.
(4) Procedures to ensure that the chief administrative
officer or designee carefully supervises and oversees the
administration of the program and the use of procurement or
purchasing cards within the county.
(5) Procedures for the chief administrative officer or
designee to keep accurate records of all purchases made with a
procurement or purchasing card, which records shall be
periodically reviewed by the chair of the county commission
and may be reviewed periodically by any member of the county
100 commission.
101 (6) Procedures to ensure that all procurement or
102 purchasing card bills are carefully reviewed by the chief
103 administrative officer or designee each month to make sure
104 that no unauthorized charges appear on the bill.
105 (7) Procedures to ensure the full cost of every
106 purchase made through the use of a procurement card is paid or
107 settled by electronic transfer within not more than 45 days of
108 the purchase.
109 (8) Procedures to ensure that the county is at all
110 times in compliance with the provisions of Article 3 of
111 Chapter 16 of Title 41.
112 (d) Any company, financial institution, or other
Page 4

(d) Any company, financial institution, or other
SB117 INTRODUCED
113 organization providing procurement card services as authorized
114 under this article shall ensure the county commission's
115 purchasing authority is suspended immediately should the
116 payment or electronic settlement for any item or service fail
117 to be received within the 45-day limit required in subdivision
118 (c)(7) of subsection (c)."
119 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
120 1, 2026.
Page 5